not-to-release/morphology/ug.lexc
! perl -pe "if(m/^\d+\t/) {@f=split(/\t/); if($f[3] eq 'ADJ') {$_=qq($f[1]\n)} else {$_=qq()}} else {$_=qq()}" < ..\..\ug-ud-test.conllu | flookup -i romanize.bin | perl -CDS -e "while(<>){s/\r?\n$//; ($ar,$la)=split(/\t/); if($la){$h{$la}++}} @k=sort(keys(%h)); foreach my $k (@k) {print qq($k\n)}" > adjlist.txt

Multichar_Symbols
+NOUN +ADJ +PRON +DET +NUM +VERB +AUX +ADV +ADP +CCONJ +SCONJ +PART +INTJ
+Prs +Dem +Ind
+Card
+Sing +Plur +1 +2 +3 +Infm +Form
+Nom +Gen +Dat +Acc +Loc +Abl
+Inf +Fin +Part +Conv +Ind +Cnd +Imp +Pres +Past +Fut +Nfh +Hab +Prog +Prosp +Perf
+Pos +Neg +Int

LEXICON Root

Noun;
Adj;
Pron;
Num;
Aux;
Verb;
Adv;
Adp;
Cconj;
Part;
Intj;



LEXICON Noun

'adem+NOUN:'adem NumberE; ! man
'ana+NOUN:'ana NumberA; ! mother
'ata+NOUN:'ata NumberA; ! father
'ige+NOUN:'ige NumberE; ! subject
'iš+NOUN:'iš NumberE; ! matter
'oğul+NOUN:'oğul NumberA; ! son
'öy+NOUN:'öy NumberE; ! house, home
bala+NOUN+Sing+Nom:bala #; ! child
bala+NOUN:bali NumberA; ! child
bilim+NOUN:bilim NumberE; ! knowledge
böre+NOUN:böre NumberE; ! wolf
čağ+NOUN:čağ NumberA; ! time
derex+NOUN:derex NumberE; ! tree
hal+NOUN:hal NumberA; ! state
hës+NOUN:hës NumberE; ! sense
jawab+NOUN:jawab NumberA; ! answer
kiši+NOUN:kiši NumberE; ! person
köz+NOUN:köz NumberE; ! eye
küni+NOUN:küni NumberE; ! day
pey+NOUN:pey NumberE; ! feather
qiz+NOUN:qiz NumberE; ! girl
qol+NOUN:qol NumberA; ! hand
su+NOUN:su NumberA; ! water
tağ+NOUN:tağ NumberA; ! mountain
toxu+NOUN:toxu NumberA; ! chicken
waqit+NOUN:waqit NumberE; ! time
xil+NOUN:xil NumberE; ! sort
yer+NOUN:yer NumberE; ! earth, ground, land
yol+NOUN:yol NumberA; ! way, road



LEXICON Pron

men+PRON+Prs+1+Sing+Nom:men         #;
men+PRON+Prs+1+Sing+Gen:mëniŋ       #;
men+PRON+Prs+1+Sing+Dat:maŋa        #;
men+PRON+Prs+1+Sing+Acc:mëni        #;
men+PRON+Prs+1+Sing+Loc:mende       #;
men+PRON+Prs+1+Sing+Abl:mendin      #;
men+PRON+Prs+1+Plur+Nom:biz         #;
men+PRON+Prs+1+Plur+Gen:bizniŋ      #;
men+PRON+Prs+1+Plur+Dat:bizge       #;
men+PRON+Prs+1+Plur+Acc:bizni       #;
men+PRON+Prs+1+Plur+Loc:bizde       #;
men+PRON+Prs+1+Plur+Abl:bizdin      #;
sen+PRON+Prs+2+Infm+Sing:sen    CaseE;
sen+PRON+Prs+2+Infm+Sing+Gen:sëniŋ  #;
sen+PRON+Prs+2+Infm+Sing+Acc:sëni   #;
sen+PRON+Prs+2+Infm+Plur:siler  CaseE;
sen+PRON+Prs+2+Infm+Plur:senler CaseE;
siz+PRON+Prs+2+Form+Sing:siz    CaseE;
siz+PRON+Prs+2+Form+Plur:sizler CaseE;
her+PRON+Prs+2+Form+Plur:her        #;
'u+PRON+Prs+3+Sing+Nom:'u           #;
'u+PRON+Prs+3+Sing+Gen:'uniŋ        #;
'u+PRON+Prs+3+Sing+Dat:'uniŋğa      #;
'u+PRON+Prs+3+Sing+Acc:'uni         #;
'u+PRON+Prs+3+Sing+Loc:'uniŋda      #;
'u+PRON+Prs+3+Sing+Abl:'uniŋdin     #;
'u+PRON+Prs+3+Plur:'ular        CaseA;

! بۇ bu = this (demonstrative)
! شۇ šu = that (demonstrative)
bu+PRON+Dem:bu #;
šu+PRON+Dem:šu #;

! قانداق qandaq = how (often mistakenly considered an adverb but it is a pronoun)

jüp+DET+Ind:jüp #; ! couple, pair
parče+DET+Ind:parče #;
qëtim+DET+Ind:qëtim #; ! occasion
tal+DET+Ind:tal #; ! single
top+DET+Ind:top #; ! ball, globe
tüp+DET+Ind:tüp #;



LEXICON NumberA

+Sing:0    CaseA;
+Plur:^lar CaseA;



LEXICON NumberE

+Sing:0    CaseE;
+Plur:^ler CaseE;



LEXICON CaseA

+Nom:^0   #;
+Gen:^niŋ #;
+Dat:^ğa  #;
+Acc:^ni  #;
+Loc:^da  #;
+Abl:^din #;



LEXICON CaseE

+Nom:^0   #;
+Gen:^niŋ #;
+Dat:^ge  #;
+Acc:^ni  #;
+Loc:^de  #;
+Abl:^din #;



LEXICON Num

nöl+NUM+Card:nöl         #; ! zero
bir+NUM+Card:bir         #; ! one
'ikki+NUM+Card:'ikki     #; ! two
'üč+NUM+Card:'üč         #; ! three
töt+NUM+Card:töt         #; ! four
beš+NUM+Card:beš         #; ! five
'alte+NUM+Card:'alte     #; ! six
yette+NUM+Card:yette     #; ! seven
sekkiz+NUM+Card:sekkiz   #; ! eight
toqquz+NUM+Card:toqquz   #; ! nine
'on+NUM+Card:'on         #; ! ten
yigirme+NUM+Card:yigirme #; ! twenty
'ottuz+NUM+Card:'ottuz   #; ! thirty
qiriq+NUM+Card:qiriq     #; ! forty
'ellik+NUM+Card:'ellik   #; ! fifty
'atmiš+NUM+Card:'atmiš   #; ! sixty
yetmiš+NUM+Card:yetmiš   #; ! seventy
seksen+NUM+Card:seksen   #; ! eighty
toqsan+NUM+Card:toqsan   #; ! ninety
yüz+NUM+Card:yüz         #; ! hundred
miŋ+NUM+Card:miŋ         #; ! thousand
milyon+NUM+Card:milyon   #; ! million
milyard+NUM+Card:milyard #; ! billion



LEXICON Aux

'i+AUX+Fin+Ind+Past+Sing+1+Pos:'idim        IntVerb;
'i+AUX+Fin+Ind+Past+Sing+2+Pos:'idiŋ        IntVerb;
'i+AUX+Fin+Ind+Past+Plur+1+Pos:'iduq        IntVerb;
'i+AUX+Fin+Ind+Past+Plur+2+Pos:'idiŋiz      IntVerb;
'i+AUX+Fin+Ind+Past+3+Pos:'idi              IntVerb;
'i+AUX+Fin+Ind+Past+X:'idikin               #;
'i+AUX+Fin+Ind+Past+Nfh+Sing+1+Pos:'ikenmen #;
'i+AUX+Fin+Ind+Past+Nfh+Sing+2+Pos:'ikensen #;
'i+AUX+Fin+Ind+Past+Nfh+Plur+1+Pos:'ikenmiz #;
'i+AUX+Fin+Ind+Past+Nfh+Plur+2+Pos:'ikensiz #;
'i+AUX+Fin+Ind+Past+Nfh+3+Pos:'iken         #;
'i+AUX+Fin+Ind+Past+Nfh+X:'ikenliki         #;



LEXICON Verb

# Conjugation table (generic, no particular verb):
# http://wiki.verbix.com/Languages/Uyghur

'aŋlimaq+VERB:'aŋli      VFormA;
'almaq+VERB:'al          VFormA;
'azmaq+VERB:'az          VFormA;
'esqatmaq+VERB:'esqat    VFormA; ! to be useful
'ëčilmek+VERB:'ëčil      VFormE;
'išlitmek+VERB:'išlit    VFormE;
'izdimek+VERB:'izdi      VFormE; ! to search
'olturmaq+VERB:'oltur    VFormA;
'oqumaq+VERB:'oqu        VFormA; ! to read
'oynimaq+VERB:'oyni      VFormA;
'ögenmek+VERB:'ögen      VFormE; ! to study
'ölmek+VERB:'öl          VFormE; ! to die
barmaq+VERB:bar          VFormA; ! to go to / reach
bilmek+VERB:bil          VFormE; ! to know
bolmaq+VERB:bol          VFormA; ! to be / to happen / to have (https://en.wiktionary.org/wiki/%D8%A8%D9%88%D9%84%D9%85%D8%A7%D9%82)
čüšenmek+VERB:čüšen      VFormE; ! to understand
čüšürmek+VERB:čüšür      VFormE; ! to download
demek+VERB:de            VFormE;
këlmek+VERB:kël          VFormE;
këtmek+VERB:kët          VFormE;
kiyiwalmek+VERB:kiyiwal  VFormE;
körmek+VERB:kör          VFormE;
maŋmaq+VERB:maŋ          VFormA;
qalmaq+VERB:qal          VFormA;
qaplimaq+VERB:qapli      VFormA;
qarimaq+VERB:qari        VFormA;
qilmek+VERB:qil          VFormE;
qilinmek+VERB:qilin      VFormE;
qoymaq+VERB:qoy          VFormA;
salmaq+VERB:sal          VFormA;
sözlemek+VERB:sözle      VFormE;
tašmaq+VERB:taš          VFormA; ! to overflow
tuğulmaq+VERB:tuğul      VFormA;
turmaq+VERB:tur          VFormA;
yasimaq+VERB:yasi        VFormA; ! to build
yašimaq+VERB:yaši        VFormA; ! to live
yazmaq+VERB:yaz          VFormA; ! to write
yëzilmek+VERB:yëzil      VFormE;

LEXICON Adj
bašqa+ADJ+Plur:bašqi^lar CaseA; ! others, used as a noun
